Rhode Island, session 2025, SB727.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47.1 entitled "Large
Capacity Feeding Device Ban of 2022" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47.1-3. Large capacity feeding devices prohibited.
(a) No person, except for a federally licensed firearm dealer, shall manufacture, sell, offer
to sell, transfer, purchase, possess, or have under his or her control a large capacity feeding device,
except as otherwise authorized under this chapter. Any person convicted of violating the provisions
of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by imprisonment of not more than
five (5) two (2) years, or by a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) one thousand dollars
($1,000), and the large capacity feeding device shall be subject to forfeiture. For subsequent
offenses, any person convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony
and punished by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years or by a fine of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) and the large capacity feeding devices shall be subject to forfeiture.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Any person who, on June 20, 2022, lawfully possesses a large capacity feeding device;
provided that, within one hundred eighty (180) days of June 20, 2022, the person:
(i) Permanently modifies the large capacity feeding device such that it cannot hold more
than ten (10) rounds of ammunition;
(ii) Surrenders the large capacity feeding device to the police department in the city or town

where the person resides in accordance with the procedures for surrender of weapons set forth by
the police department or the Rhode Island state police, or, if there is no such police department or
the person resides out of state, to the Rhode Island state police; or
(iii) Transfers or sells the large capacity feeding device to a federally licensed firearm
dealer or person or firm outside the State of Rhode Island that is lawfully entitled to own or possess
such a feeding device.
(2)(i) Any law enforcement officer exempt under §§ 11-47-9 and 11-47-9.1; or
(ii) A retired law enforcement officer exempt under §§ 11-47-9 and 11-47-9.1 who is not
otherwise prohibited from receiving such a feeding device from such agency upon retirement, and
who has a permit to carry pursuant to § 11-47-18(b).
(3) An active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard
who is authorized to possess and carry such a feeding device.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001853
========
LC001853 - Page 2 of 3